dictionaries/uk/index.dic
Альперін/C
Амалія/%;h
Анастасійович/1:
аплікантка/%<h
Астахов/C
багатоцифровість/A
базарянин/1:8x
Балабан/1:
баланда/%;
бараняр/4"(K
Басань/D!
Бастрикін/C
безшарнірність/A
бенд-лідерка/%<h
Білів/0u6
блейзер/1:$
Бовшів/2@z
Боголюбов/C
Бондар/4"
бориспільчанин/1:8x
бретель/D-
брехня/%9
бригантинка/%<
Брюшків/0u6
булла/%;
Бурлаков/C
вабик/1:$
вавілонянин/1:8x
Валентіїв/j2@z
вашківчанин/1:8x
вельможність/Am?
вервечка/%<
вивести/]=
визначити/XJN7
визначитися/XJ7
викласти/]=
викроїтися/X>
випарюваність/A
Виповзів/0u6
випрясти/]=
виселок/4"(3`d
Витань/D!
Вишняков/C
відкласти/]=
відкупник/1:$
відміна/%;
візажистка/%<h
вінничанин/1:8x
Вірлів/2@z
вкрасти/]=
ворсклянин/1:8x
всесильність/Am
вугляр/4"(K
галич/D
галичанин/1:8x
галька/%<
Гапонов/C
геокарпія/%;
гидь/D
Гліб/1:$x
Глушків/0u6
голубінь/D
гордість/Am?
Горяїнов/C
господарочка/%<h
Гошів/2@z
Грабар/4"
громадянин/1:8x
Гуків/0u6
Дак/1:
дводушниця/%;h
двоїти/Xy>
двоїтися/Xyt>
декоративність/A
Дернів/2@z
джихадистка/%<h
дієтлікар/4"(
Добромиль/1:
довизначити/XJN7
доїсти/]=
домувальниця/%;h
Донцов/C
дооформити/XJ7N
доперекласти/]=
Дордонь/D!
дорозкрасти/]=
дошка/%9
Дроздів/0u6
екс-львів'янин/1:8x
екс-прес-секретар/4"(
електрокамін/1:$
еродованість/A
Есмеральда/%;h
жироловка/%<
Жовідь/D!
завести/]=
завіритель/1:$
Задарів/0u6
Заздрість/A?
закласти/]=
засолюваність/A
Зборишів/2@z
звір/1:Bx
звягельчанин/1:8x
здвоїти/X>N
здвоїтися/X>
Здорин/C
злодіюга/%;h
зморшка/%9
знаменитість/Am?
знать/D
знахар/4"(
зрозумілість/Am
іменитість/Am?
індивідуальність/Am?
інопланетянин/1:8x
казочка/%<
кальдера/%;
камінь/2@I
канівчанин/1:8x
Каришків/0u6
Карпишин/C
квадруполь/1:$
кендир/4
кефаль/D-!
Кінашів/2@z
кінознаменитість/Am?
кіноособистість/Am?
кінотематика/%;
Ковбань/D!
Колот/1:
комар/1:xB
коминяр/4"(K
комплексність/Am
конкурсантка/%<h
Коржів/2@z
коринфянин/1:8x
Коростильов/C
Косів/H0u6
Кочерів/2@z
краплина/%;
кувейтянин/1:8x
Кужіль/2@
Курипів/0u6
Кухар/4"
Лазарєв/C
Летичів/2@z
літ/1:$24
літературоман/1:$x
літосфера/%;
ліцеїстка/%<h
Лопань/D!
М'якохід/0u6
мажорність/A
македонянин/1:8x
Маркаров/C
мегазнаменитість/Am?
медулобластома/%;
Метенів/2@z
митар/4"(
Михнів/0u6
мідь/D
Міць/A?
Могитич/1:
модерністка/%<h
мокшанин/1:8x
моноспеціалізація/%;
мочар/1:B
мочаруватість/A
Мусаєв/C
наброїти/X>N
навести/]=
накрасти/]=
Нараїв/2@z
нашатир/4
невитонченість/A
некон'юнктурність/A
нелюбов/D
Немирів/0u6
нераціональність/Am
неросіянин/1:8x
нечепура/%;h
ніжність/Am?
обвести/]=
обкрасти/]=
оборудка/%<
обриганість/A
одинокість/A?
Олешків/0u6
Оржів/2@z
орієнтант/1:$
орудар/4"(K
особистість/Am?
оформити/XJ7N
очистити/XJN7
очиститися/XJ7
павідь/D-
пажерливість/A
Пальмира/%;h
панщанин/1:8x
парасоля/%9
Пашаєв/C
перевизначити/XN7
Перекіп/06
перекласти/]=
перекроїтися/X>
Перерісль/A?
перетроїти/X>
переукласти/]=
перфострічка/%<
писар/4"(
піднормаль/D-
підтвердити/XJ7N
пір'їна/%;
пластир/1B
Плетінь/2@
площинність/A
подвоїти/X>N
подвоїтися/X>
поїжджанин/1:8x
покласти/]=
поліпшити/XJN7
поліпшитися/XJ7
Політвідділовець/3`4"
Поляруш/1:
Помлинів/0u6
помовчати/XJ7
посередність/Am?
посоромити/XNJ7
посудинка/%<
потроїти/X>N
потроїтися/X>
почервонілість/A
пошесть/D-
прескрипція/%;
привести/]=
провести/]=
профспілчанин/1:8x
Пряжів/2@z
прямокутність/A
псевдолікар/4"(K
Радивілов/C
радіопередача/%;
радіоповість/D-
радість/Am?
рід/0w6
річенька/%<
розвести/]=
роздвоїти/X>N
роздвоїтися/X>
розкласифікованість/A
розплющитися/XJ7
розпорскувач/1:$
розпрясти/]=
Ролів/2@z
ростовчанин/1:8x
Ротар/4"K
Саврань/D!
самовизначитися/XJ7
Самодуров/C
світлість/Am?
святість/Am?
Селюків/0u6
Сіль/A?
скатертинонька/%<
скляр/4"(K
скнара/%;h
славутчанин/1:8x
смовдь/D
Сморжів/2@z
снігур/1:Bx
Солуків/0u6
Спас/1:x
Стариков/C
стовідсотковість/A
стріт-футболістка/%<h
сум'янин/1:8x
Сусолів/2@z
суш/D-
Тараканів/0u6
тачкар/4"(K
телезнаменитість/Am?
теліостадія/%;
тля/%9h
Тмуторокань/D!
товароодержувач/1:$
троїти/Xyt>
троїтися/Xyt>
Трофімов/C
трутнівка/%<
Турбів/0u6
Тяглів/2@z
украсти/]=
фастівчанин/1:8x
фініфть/D
форсовність/A
футлярник/1:$
хвоя/%;
хмаронька/%<
хмеляр/4"(K
Хохлов/C
Хребтіїв/2@z
Хренів/0u6
черкащанин/1:8x
чинар/1:B
Шандровець/4"
шестірня/%9
шилохвість/Am?
Шиляєв/C
штангістка/%<h
Шунь/1:
Юність/A?
Яремків/0u6
